Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Special Designations of Portions of Highway System and Bridges

§ 65-3-38.
Designation of scenic route in Sardis Lake area.

The following segments of highways located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as a scenic route:

Mississippi Highway 315 beginning at a point of intersection with Interstate 55, running east to the intersection with Sardis Dam Road, thence southerly along the route of the Sardis Dam then to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 35, thence running west along the route of Mississippi Highway 35 to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 6, thence in an easterly direction to its intersection with Interstate 55.

The State Highway Department may plan and erect suitable signs and markers along such route and along the interstate approaches to the area. Such signs shall be attractive and designed to invite and encourage tourism, recreation and camping in the area.

The State Highway Department may establish and maintain rest and observation areas along the designated route and may invite the participation of and cooperate with any state, county or municipal agency to assist in the promotion and development of the scenic route hereinabove designated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 309, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 9, 1976).

§ 65-3-38.1.
Certain restrictions on designations for highways, roads, streets and bridges.

No highway, road, street or bridge on the designated state highway system may be named after any person elected by the people to any public office in this state during the term of such person’s office or for a period of ten (10) years after such person no longer served in any such office.

No legislation shall be enacted by the Legislature naming any highway, road, street or bridge on the designated state highway system after any person unless the governing body of each county and municipality where the highway, road, street or bridge is located duly adopts a resolution requesting the Legislature to enact such legislation and files a certified copy of such resolution with the Chairman of the Senate or House Committee to which such legislation is referred.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to Sections 65-7-151 and 65-7-153.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 556, § 5; Laws, 2013, ch. 342, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 65-3-39.
“The Veterans’ Memorial Highway” designated.

U.S. Highway 45 within the State of Mississippi is hereby designated as “The Veterans’ Memorial Highway” in honor of and in genuine gratitude and appreciation for the contributions made by veterans of this state in the defense of and service to this country, excluding, however, that portion from Baldwyn in Lee County to Nettleton in Lee County previously designated as the “David Williams Robins Highway” by Chapter 300, Laws of 1954. The State Highway Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to allow the erection on the highway rights-of-way of suitable monuments and markers as prescribed and provided by the veterans’ organizations within the state.

Upon the completion of the corridor through the eastern part of the state from Tennessee to the Gulf of Mexico as authorized by Chapter 484, Laws of 1972, said new corridor shall be designated as “The Veterans’ Memorial Highway” in appreciation for the services of veterans to this state and the State Highway Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to allow the erection on the highway rights-of-way suitable monuments and markers as prescribed and provided by the veterans’ organizations within the state and the designation of old U. S. Highway 45 as “the Veterans’ Memorial Highway” shall be abandoned.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 349, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1973).

§ 65-3-40.
Portion of Highway 35 in Leake County designated “Veterans’ Memorial Highway”.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 35 in Leake County beginning at the Scott County Line and extending northerly to the south corporate limits of the City of Carthage is designated and shall be known as the “Veterans’ Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 353, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 2000.).

§ 65-3-41.
“Frank Louis Hawkins Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 430, being situated between the Village of Black Hawk, Mississippi, and the Town of Vaiden, Mississippi, shall be designated and henceforth known as the Frank Louis Hawkins Memorial Highway.

The State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along and approaching said highway and further to erect a suitable memorial marker between the Town of Vaiden, Mississippi, and the Black Hawk community, at a site to be chosen with the approval of the survivors and family of Frank Louis Hawkins.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 324, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 5, 1975).

§ 65-3-43.
“Elvis Aaron Presley Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of United States Highway 78 being situated between the southern boundary of the state of Tennessee and the western boundary of the state of Alabama shall be designated and henceforth known as the Elvis Aaron Presley Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along and approaching said highway and, further, to erect a suitable memorial marker between the City of Tupelo, Mississippi, and the Town of Mineral Wells, Mississippi, at a site to be chosen with the approval of the family of Elvis Aaron Presley.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 302, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved February 8, 1978).

§ 65-3-45.
“Walter L. Nixon, Sr., Memorial Bridge” designated.

The bridge which spans the Back Bay of Biloxi on Interstate Highway 110 between Biloxi, Mississippi, and D’Iberville, Mississippi, known as the “Back Bay Bridge,” shall be designated and henceforth known as the Walter L. Nixon, Sr., Memorial Bridge.

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby authorized to erect a suitable memorial marker between the cites of Biloxi, Mississippi, and D’Iberville, Mississippi, at a site to be chosen with the approval of the survivors and family of Walter L. Nixon, Sr.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 323, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 2, 1978).

§ 65-3-47.
Designation of scenic route in Enid Lake area.

The following segments of roads located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as a scenic route:

The access road beginning at a point of intersection with Interstate 55 at Exit 58 and running east to the intersection with Enid Dam Road, thence southerly along the route of the Enid Dam Road then to its intersection with U.S. Highway 51, thence running southerly along the route of U.S. Highway 51 to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 32, thence in an easterly direction to its intersection with Interstate 55 at Exit 57.

The State Highway Department may plan and erect suitable signs and markers along such route and along the interstate approaches to the area. Such signs shall be attractive and designed to invite and encourage tourism, recreation and camping in the area.

The State Highway Department may establish and maintain rest and observation areas along the designated route and may invite the participation of and cooperate with any state, county or municipal agency to assist in the promotion and development of the scenic route hereinabove designated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 306, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 65-3-49.
Designation of scenic route in Arkabutla Lake area.

The following segments of highways located in the state of Mississippi are hereby designated as a scenic route:

The public road beginning at Interstate Highway 55 adjacent to the City of Coldwater, Mississippi, and thence along the Coldwater-Arkabutla Road in a Westerly direction, and thence turning in a generally Northerly direction from said road to and along a public road which crosses the Dam area of Arkabutla Lake, thence proceeding on the North side of such Dam area in a Westerly direction, thence proceeding in a Northerly direction to the community of Eudora and connecting with State Highway 304 and thence running in an Easterly direction along State Highway No. 304 through the City of Hernando to Interstate Highway 55.

The State Highway Department may plan and erect suitable signs and markers along such route and along the interstate approaches to the area. Such signs shall be attractive and designed to invite and encourage tourism, recreation and camping in the area.

The State Highway Department may establish and maintain rest and observation areas along the designated route and may invite the participation of and cooperate with any state, county or municipal agency to assist in the promotion and development of the scenic route hereinabove designated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 307, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 65-3-51.
“Donnie Gene Kelley Memorial Bridge” designated.

The State Highway Commission is hereby directed to designate the bridge located at the interchange of U.S. Highway 61 and U.S. Highway 82 in Leland, Mississippi, as the “Donnie Gene Kelley Memorial Bridge” and to place appropriate markers at each end of the bridge.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 325, eff from and after passage (approved March 1, 1979).

§ 65-3-53.
“Perry Davis Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of State Highway 481 from State Highway 43 southeast at Pisgah in Rankin County, Mississippi, to United States Highway 80 in Morton, Scott County, Mississippi, shall be designated and henceforth known as the Perry Davis Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along and approaching said highway and, further, to erect a suitable memorial marker between Pisgah, Mississippi, and the Town of Morton, Mississippi, at a site to be chosen with the approval of the family of Perry Davis.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 328, eff from and after passage (approved March 1, 1979).

§ 65-3-55.
“Hospitality Highway” designated.

That portion of State Highway 607 from the junction with Interstate Highway 10 to the junction with U.S. Highway 90, and that portion of U.S. Highway 90 from the junction with State Highway 607 to the western boundary of the State of Alabama shall be designated and henceforth known as the “Hospitality Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along and approaching the Hospitality Highway, as described in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 329, eff from and after passage (approved March 1, 1979).

§ 65-3-57.
“William G. Walter Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of the Mississippi Highway No. 13 running from the intersection of such highway with Mississippi Highway No. 16 in Leake County, Mississippi, and continuing southerly through the counties of Leake, Scott, Rankin and Simpson shall be designated and henceforth known as the William G. Walter Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 331, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1980).

§ 65-3-58.
“Osborne Bell Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 309 in Marshall County, Mississippi, beginning at or near the community of Watson and running southerly for a distance of 9.5 miles until its intersection with Mississippi Highway 4, is hereby designated and henceforth shall be known as the “Osborne Bell Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 305, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 7, 1988).

§ 65-3-59.
“William Faulkner Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 7 from the point of intersection with Mississippi Highway 315 to the point of intersection with the Tennessee state line shall be designated and henceforth known as the “William Faulkner Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along and approaching the William Faulkner Memorial Highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 393, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 65-3-61.
“James Duncan Arrington Memorial Highway” designated.

Mississippi Highway 588, situated between Collins, Mississippi, and Ellisville, Mississippi, shall be designated and henceforth known as the James Duncan Arrington Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby authorized and directed to erect appropriate signs along and approaching said highway and, further, to erect a suitable memorial marker between Collins, Mississippi, and Ellisville, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1981).

§ 65-3-62.
“James O. Eastland Memorial Highway” designated.

Interstate Highway 55, with the exception of that portion of Interstate Highway 55 which is within Panola County, is hereby designated and henceforth shall be known as the “James O. Eastland Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby authorized and directed to erect not less than four (4) granite memorials at appropriate locations along and approaching the “James O. Eastland Memorial Highway,” and such other signs as the department shall deem suitable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 318, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 2, 1989).

§ 65-3-63.
“Hugh White Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of the Mississippi Highway No. 13 running from the City of Columbia in Marion County to its intersection with the Simpson County line shall be designated and henceforth known as the Hugh White Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 438, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1981).

§ 65-3-64.
Designation of scenic route; Mississippi Highway 5 between U.S. Highway 78 and 72.

The following segment of highway located in the State of Mississippi is hereby designated as a scenic route:

That portion of Mississippi Highway 5 between United States Highway 78 and United States Highway 72.

The State Highway Department may plan and erect suitable signs and markers along such route and along approaches to the area. Such signs shall be attractive and designed to invite and encourage tourism, recreation and camping in the area.

The State Highway Department may establish and maintain rest and observation areas along the designated route and may invite the participation of and cooperate with any state, county or municipal agency to assist in the promotion and development of the scenic route hereinabove designated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 316, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 2, 1989).

§ 65-3-65.
“Henry Clarence Strider Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway No. 32 running between the municipalities of Webb and Charleston in Tallahatchie County shall be designated and henceforth known as the Henry Clarence Strider Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 364, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 65-3-66.
“John C. Stennis Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 39 from its intersection with Mississippi Highway 45 in Lauderdale County as it extends north to the intersection with Mississippi Highway 16 in DeKalb, Mississippi, is hereby designated and henceforth shall be known as the “John C. Stennis Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby authorized and directed to erect not less than two (2) granite memorials at appropriate locations along and approaching the highway, and such other signs as the department shall deem suitable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 309, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 2, 1989).

§ 65-3-67.
“John Bell Williams Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 18, being situated between the city of Jackson, Mississippi, and the town of Raymond, Mississippi, shall be designated and henceforth known as the “John Bell Williams Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along and approaching said highway and further to erect a suitable memorial marker between the city of Jackson and the town of Raymond, at a site to be chosen with the approval of the survivors and family of John Bell Williams.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 533, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1983).

§ 65-3-68.
“George Walter Holloway Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 42 lying in Jefferson Davis County shall be designated and henceforth shall be known as the “George Walter Holloway Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along Mississippi Highway 42 at the entrances to Jefferson Davis County and at the exits from the town of Prentiss.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 356, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1984).

§ 65-3-69.
“Jake W. Lindsey Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 63 lying in Wayne County shall be designated and henceforth shall be known as the “Jake W. Lindsey Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along Mississippi Highway 63 at the entrances to Wayne County and at the exits from the Town of Waynesboro.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 371, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1984).

§ 65-3-70.
“William Russell Bonds Memorial Bridge” designated.

The bridge which spans the Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway on U. S. Highway 72 shall be designated and henceforth known as the “William Russell Bonds Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby authorized and directed to erect appropriate markers at each end of such bridge.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 334, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1987).

§ 65-3-71.
“Dr. W. C. Simmons Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 18, which is situated in Jasper County from the corporate limits of the town of Bay Springs to the Smith County line shall be designated and known as the “Dr. W. C. Simmons Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs identifying such memorial highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 339, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1987).

§ 65-3-71.1.
“Cliff Finch Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Interstate Highway 55 which is within Panola County is hereby designated and henceforth shall be known as the “Cliff Finch Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs at rest areas along such highway in Panola County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 376, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1987).

§ 65-3-71.2.
“Howard Dyer Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 82, being situated between the City of Greenville, Mississippi, and the City of Leland, Mississippi, shall be designated and henceforth known as the “Howard Dyer Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along and approaching such highway and further to erect a suitable memorial marker between the City of Greenville and the City of Leland.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 404, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1987).

§ 65-3-71.3.
“The Singing River” designated.

The crossing of U.S. Highway 90 over the East Pascagoula River shall be designated and henceforth known as “The Singing River.”

The State Highway Department is hereby authorized to erect appropriate markers at each end of the bridge.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 408, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 65-3-71.4.
“George M. Yarbrough Highway” designated.

That portion of highway added to the state highway system in Chapter 298, General Laws of 1954, more particularly described as beginning on U.S. 78 at or near Red Banks, thence through the business district of Red Banks, and ending on U.S. 78, shall be designated and henceforth known as the George M. Yarbrough Highway.

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 410, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1987).

§ 65-3-71.5.
“John E. Rankin Memorial Bridge” designated.

The bridge which spans the Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway on United States Highway 78 at Fulton, Mississippi, shall be designated and henceforth known as the “John E. Rankin Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby authorized to place appropriate markers at each end of the bridge.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 317, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 65-3-71.6.
“Owen Cooper Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 49 from its intersection with Interstate 220 at Jackson, Mississippi, to the point where it divides into U.S. Highway 49 East and U.S. Highway 49 West in Yazoo County is hereby designated and henceforth shall be known as the “Owen Cooper Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 360, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1988).

§ 65-3-71.7.
“Lee C. Seymour, Sr., Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Interstate Highway 110 north of the Interstate Highway 110 bridge within the municipal limits of the City of d’Iberville is hereby designated and henceforth shall be known as the “Lee C. Seymour, Sr., Memorial Highway.”

The State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 450, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1988).

§ 65-3-71.8.
“John Sharp Williams Memorial Bridge” designated.

Upon completion of construction of the new bridge over the Yazoo River on U. S. Highway 49 West in Yazoo County, Mississippi, between Yazoo City and Louise, such bridge shall be known and shall be designated as the “John Sharp Williams Memorial Bridge,” and the State Highway Department shall erect suitable markers along and approaching such bridge to reflect the name thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 436, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1988).

§ 65-3-71.9.
“Guy Williams Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 32 from Parchman in Sunflower County to the corporate limits of the Town of Webb in Tallahatchie County is hereby designated and henceforth shall be known as the “Guy Williams Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 440, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1988).

§ 65-3-71.10.
Hurricane evacuation routes designated.

The State Highway Commission is hereby directed to have the State Highway Department to erect appropriate signs on and along all highways leading northerly from the Mississippi Gulf Coast designating such highways as hurricane evacuation routes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 366, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 65-3-71.11.
“Charles H. Griffin Memorial Highway” designated.

Mississippi Highway 18 between the municipalities of Raymond and Port Gibson is hereby designated, and henceforth shall be known as, the “Charles H. Griffin Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby authorized and directed to erect memorials at appropriate locations along and approaching the designated segment of such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 445, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1990).

§ 65-3-71.12.
“Bill Harpole Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 12 from its intersection with Mississippi Highway 25 in the City of Starkville to its intersection with U. S. Highway 82 in Oktibbeha County is hereby designated as the “Bill Harpole Highway.”

The State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs on the designated segment of such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 487, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 27, 1990).

§ 65-3-71.13.
“Fred J. Vann Memorial Highway,” “Dr. Fayette C. Williams Memorial Highway,” and “Bilbo Anders Memorial Drive” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 350 from its intersection with Kendrick Road in Alcorn County extending eastwardly to Mississippi Highway 25 in Tishomingo County is hereby designated the “Fred J. Vann Memorial Highway.”

That portion of U.S. Highway 72 within Alcorn County is hereby designated the “Dr. Fayette C. Williams Memorial Highway.”

That portion of Mississippi Highway 39 from its intersection with U.S. Interstate Highway 20/59 in Lauderdale County extending northerly to its intersection with Old U.S. Highway 45 to Marion is hereby designated and henceforth shall be known as the “Bilbo Anders Memorial Drive.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highways.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 511, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1990).

§ 65-3-71.14.
“Herman Alford Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 19 from its intersection with Mississippi Highway 15 in the City of Philadelphia which extends in a northerly direction to the corporate limits of such city is hereby designated as the “Herman Alford Memorial Highway.”

The State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs on the designated segment of such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 49, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 30, 1990).

§ 65-3-71.15.
“J.A. (Jim) Morrow Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 18 located in Rankin County beginning at the corporate limits of the City of Brandon and extending southeasterly to the Smith County line is hereby designated as the “J. A. (Jim) Morrow Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 400, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1991).

§ 65-3-71.16.
“Roger B. Latimer Memorial Bridge” designated.

The bridge spanning Horn Lake Creek located within the City of Horn Lake on Mississippi Highway 302 (Goodman Road) approximately one-tenth (1/10) of a mile east of the intersection of that highway with U.S. Highway 51 shall be designated and henceforth known as the “Roger B. Latimer Memorial Bridge.”

The State Highway Department is hereby authorized and directed to erect appropriate markers at each end of the bridge.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 433 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 21, 1991).

§ 65-3-71.17.
“Castiglia Interchange” designated.

The Interstate 10 and Highway 49 interchange in Harrison County is hereby designated, and henceforth shall be known as, the “Castiglia Interchange.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby authorized and directed to erect appropriate signs at locations along the interchange.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 488 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1991).

§ 65-3-71.18.
“Hernando de Soto Commemorative Bridge” designated.

From and after June 18, 1991, the Mississippi River Bridge on U.S. Highway 49 near Lula, Mississippi, from its easternmost point westward to the Arkansas state line, shall be named and designated the “Hernando de Soto Commemorative Bridge” in recognition, observation and commemoration of Spanish Explorer Hernando de Soto who discovered the Mississippi River on May 8, 1541, and subsequently crossed the river on June 18, 1541.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 488 § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1991).

§ 65-3-71.19.
“Billy Cooper Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 57 in Greene County beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 63 near Leakesville and extending northerly to the corporate limits of State Line is designated and shall be known as the “Billy Cooper Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 548, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 65-3-71.20.
Portion of Mississippi Highway 35 designated as scenic highway.

The following segment of highway located in Panola, Tallahatchie, Grenada and Carroll Counties is hereby designated as a scenic highway:

Mississippi Highway 35 beginning at the corporate limits of the City of Batesville and extending southerly to the corporate limits of the Town of Vaiden.

The State Highway Department may plan and erect suitable signs and markers along the above described segment of highway and along the interstate approaches to such highway. Such signs shall be attractive and designed to invite and encourage tourism, recreation and camping in the area.

The State Highway Department may establish and maintain rest and observation areas along the designated segment of highway and may invite the participation of and cooperate with any state, county or municipal agency to assist in the promotion and development of the scenic highway hereinabove designated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 548, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 65-3-71.21.
“W. Felder Dearman Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 22 which is between the municipalities of Edwards and Canton in Hinds and Madison Counties is hereby designated, and henceforth shall be known as, the “W. Felder Dearman Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby authorized and directed to erect memorials at appropriate locations along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 308 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1992).

§ 65-3-71.22.
“Tammy Wynette Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 23 in Itawamba County located between the Town of Tremont and the Alabama State Line is hereby designated the “Tammy Wynette Highway.”

The State Highway Department shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1992).

§ 65-3-71.23.
“Jerry Clower Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 24 between the cities of Liberty and McComb is hereby designated the “Jerry Clower Highway.”

The State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 372, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1992).

§ 65-3-71.24.
Mississippi Highways 63 and 57 designated wildflower routes.

Mississippi Highways 63 and 57 are designated as wildflower routes, and the State Highway Department shall take the necessary measures in maintaining rights-of-way along such highways to encourage the growth of native wildflowers. Such measures shall include, but not be limited to, (a) refraining from the use of herbicides, (b) planting native wildflowers, and (c) when mowing becomes necessary, mowing selectively in order to preserve wildflowers during their growing seasons.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 411, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1992).

§ 65-3-71.25.
“Vietnam Veterans Memorial Bridge” designated.

That bridge on Mississippi Highway 63 in Jackson County that spans the Escatawpa River is designated and shall be known as the “Vietnam Veterans Memorial Bridge.”

The Transportation Department shall erect and maintain an appropriate plaque at each end of the bridge, and suitable markers along and approaching the bridge, reflecting its name.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 318, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1993).

§ 65-3-71.26.
“Robert L. Hollimon Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 492 between the Town of Union in Newton County and Mississippi Highway 19 in Neshoba County is hereby designated the “Robert L. Hollimon Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 340, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1993).

§ 65-3-71.27.
“Naaman Bryanyan Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 9 in Union County from its intersection with Mississippi Highway 348 to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 30 is designated and shall be known as the “Naaman Bryanyan Memorial Highway.”

The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs approaching and along such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 428, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1993).

§ 65-3-71.28.
“Larkin I. Smith Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 53 from its intersection with U.S. Highway 49 in Harrison County as it extends northwesterly through Hancock County to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 26 in Pearl River County is hereby designated and henceforth shall be known as the “Larkin I. Smith Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 447, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1993).

§ 65-3-71.29.
“Charley Pride Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 3 located between U.S. Highway 61 in DeSoto County and the Town of Tutwiler in Tallahatchie County is hereby designated the “Charley Pride Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 454, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1993).

§ 65-3-71.30.
“George D. ‘Danny’ Nash, Jr., Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U. S. Highway 84 in Franklin County, Mississippi, beginning four (4) miles west of its intersection with U. S. Highway 98 and extending to a point six (6) miles west of the intersection of U. S. Highway 84 and U. S. Highway 98 shall be known and designated as the “George D. ‘Danny’ Nash, Jr., Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 360, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 65-3-71.31.
“Pat Patterson Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 25 within the corporate limits of the City of Aberdeen, beginning at the intersection of Mississippi Highway 25 and Poplar Street and extending to the Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway Bridge, is designated and shall be known as the “Pat Patterson Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 316, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 9, 1995).

§ 65-3-71.32.
“Bobby Runnels Memorial Drive” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 42 in the City of Petal, Mississippi, beginning at the Norfolk Southern Railroad and extending approximately one-half (1/2) mile to its intersection with Main Street is designated and shall be known as “Bobby Runnels Memorial Drive.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs on and along such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 334, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1995).

§ 65-3-71.33.
“Veterans Memorial Drive” designated.

That section of Mississippi Highway 35 bypass from the Kosciusko city limits south to Mississippi Highway 12 east is designated and shall be known as “Veterans Memorial Drive.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the section of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 351, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1995).

§ 65-3-71.34.
“Billy M. Langham Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 49 in Collins, Mississippi, beginning at a point eight-tenths (.8) of a mile south of the intersection of U.S. Highway 49 and U.S. Highway 84 and extending south on U.S. Highway 49 for two (2) miles shall be known and designated as the “Billy M. Langham Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 390, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§ 65-3-71.35.
“State Trooper Bobby ‘Bubba’ Wells Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Interstate Highway 55 beginning at mile marker 277 and extending northerly to the Mississippi/Tennessee state line is designated and shall be known as the “State Trooper Bobby ‘Bubba’ Wells Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 331, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 545, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2007.).

§ 65-3-71.36.
“Norton Haas Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 43/603 in Hancock County beginning at United States Highway 90 and extending northerly to its intersection with Interstate Highway 10 is designated and shall be known as the “Norton Haas Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs on and along that portion of Mississippi Highway 43/603 described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 344, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1996).

§ 65-3-71.37.
“Rayford Patrick Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 305 in Tate County from its intersection with Mississippi 4 to the Bett Road turnoff shall be known as the “Rayford Patrick Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 347, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 65-3-71.38.
“David Bruce Ladner Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 49 in Lyman, Mississippi, beginning at the intersection of U.S. Highway 49 and Mississippi Highway 53 and extending north on U.S. Highway 49 for two (2) miles shall be known and designated as the “David Bruce Ladner Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 361, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1996).